Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-885.52
Continuing education and training; certify activities.

(1) The commission shall certify as approved continuing education activities
those courses, lectures, seminars, or other instructional programs which it
determines would protect the public by improving the competency of licensees.
The commission may require descriptive information about any continuing education or training activity and refuse
approval of any continuing education or
training activity which does not advance the purposes of sections
81-885.49 to 81-885.54. The commission shall not approve any provider of continuing
education or training courses,
lectures, seminars, or other instructional programs unless such provider meets
the standards established by the commission.

(2) The commission shall certify the number of hours to be awarded for
participation in an approved continuing education activity, based upon contact
or classroom hours or other criteria prescribed by rule and regulation of
the commission.

(3) The commission may certify the number of hours to be awarded for
successful completion of a course delivered in a distance education format,
based upon the number of hours which would be awarded in an equivalent classroom
course or program or other criteria prescribed by rule and regulation of the
commission.

Laws 1985, LB 101, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 26;

Laws 2011, LB24, § 3.